Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.340.085

Innovation academy cooperatives—Characteristics—Cooperation with institutions of higher education.

(1) For the purposes of RCW 28A.340.080 through 28A.340.090, an innovation academy cooperative is a high school program with one or more of the following characteristics:

(a) Interdisciplinary curriculum and instruction organized into subject-focused themes or academies. Programs are encouraged to provide an initial focus on academies in science, technology, engineering, and mathematics;

(b) A combination of instructional service delivery models, including alternative learning experiences, online learning, work-based learning, experiential and field-based learning, and direct classroom instruction at multiple and varying locations;

(c) Intensive and accelerated learning to enable students to complete high school credits in a short time period; and

(d) Creative scheduling and use of existing school or community facilities in innovative ways to minimize facility and transportation costs and maximize access for students who may be geographically dispersed.

(2) Participating nonhigh school districts shall work with local community and technical colleges and four-year institutions of higher education to expand the learning options available for students in an innovation academy cooperative.

[ 2010 c 99 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2010 c 99: See note following RCW 28A.340.080.